Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3138
System of home and community-based
long-term care services; grant application; department; duties; report.

(1) The Department
of Health and Human Services shall apply to the United States Department of
Health and Human Services for a grant under the State Balancing Incentive
Payments Program enacted in section 10202 of the federal Patient Protection
and Affordable Care Act. Funds from the grant shall be used to develop a comprehensive
and coordinated system of home and community-based long-term care services.
The department shall file the grant application not later than July 31, 2014,
and the application shall meet the requirements of section 10202 of the federal
Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.

(2) On or before
December 1, 2014, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report
electronically to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature
on the status of the grant application.

Laws 2014, LB690, § 1.
July 18, 2014